Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Part 1. Definitions and Other General Provisions

§ 1-101.
Short title.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 1-102.
[Reserved.]

§ 1-103.
Definitions.

In this title:

“Affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a declarant.

A person “controls” a declarant if the person:

is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the declarant;

directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote or holds proxies representing, more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the declarant;

controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant; or

has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the declarant.

A person “is controlled by” a declarant if the declarant:

is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person;

directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the person;

controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or

has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the person.

Control does not exist if the powers described in this subdivision are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

“Allocated interests” mean the following interests allocated to each unit:

In a condominium, the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association.

In a planned community, the common expense liability and votes in the association.

“Association” or “unit owners’ association” means the unit owners’ association organized under section 3-101 of this title.

“Common elements” mean:

In a condominium, all portions of the common interest community other than the units.

In a planned community, any real estate within a planned community owned or leased by the association, other than a unit.

“Common expenses” means expenditures made by or financial liabilities of the association together with any allocations to reserves.

“Common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to section 2-107 of this title.

“Common interest community” means real estate described in a declaration with respect to which a person, by virtue of the person’s ownership of a unit, is obligated to pay for a share of real estate taxes on, insurance premiums, maintenance, or improvement of, or services or other expenses related to common elements, other units, or other real estate other than that unit described in the declaration. The term does not include an arrangement described in section 1-207 of this title. For purposes of this subdivision, ownership of a unit does not include holding a leasehold interest of less than five years in a unit, including renewal options.

“Condominium” means a common interest community in which portions of the real estate are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of the real estate is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions. A common interest community is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners.

“Conversion building” means a building that at any time before creation of the common interest community was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers and persons who occupy with the consent of purchasers.

“Cooperative” means a regime created pursuant to 11 V.S.A. chapter 14; a cooperative is not a common interest community for the purposes of this title.

“Dealer” means a person in the business of selling units for his or her own account.

“Declarant” means a person or group of persons acting in concert that:

as a part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of the interest of the person or group of persons in a unit not previously disposed of; or

reserves or succeeds to any special declarant right.

“Declaration” means any instruments, however denominated, that create a common interest community and any amendments to those instruments.

“Development rights” mean any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to:

add real estate to a common interest community;

create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a common interest community;

subdivide units or convert units into common elements; or

withdraw real estate from a common interest community.

“Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

“Executive board” means the body, regardless of name, designated in the declaration or bylaws, which has the power to act on behalf of the association.

“Identifying number” means a symbol or address that identifies only one unit in a common interest community.

“Leasehold common interest community” means a common interest community in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease the expiration or termination of which will terminate the common interest community or reduce its size.

“Limited common element” means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of subdivision 2-102(2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one or more but fewer than all of the units.

“Master association” means an organization described in section 2-120 of this title, whether or not it is also an association described in section 3-101 of this title.

“Offer” or “Offering” means any advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to encourage any person to acquire any interest in a unit, other than as security for an obligation. An advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical of general circulation or in any broadcast medium to the general public of a common interest community not located in this state is not an offering if the advertisement states that an offering may be made only in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the common interest community is located.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal or commercial entity. In the case of a land trust, “person” means the beneficiary of the trust rather than the trust or trustee.

“Planned community” means a common interest community which is not a condominium or cooperative. A condominium or cooperative may be part of a planned community.

“Purchaser” means any person, other than a declarant or a dealer, who by means of a voluntary transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than:

a leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than 20 years; or

as security for an obligation.

“Real estate” means any leasehold or other estate or interest in, over or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests which by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. “Real estate” includes parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water.

“Residential purposes” mean use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.

“Security interest” means an interest in real estate or personal property, created by contract or conveyance, which secures payment or performance of an obligation. “Security interest” includes a lien created by a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security deed, contract for deed, land sales contract, lease intended as security, assignment of lease or rents intended as security, pledge of an ownership interest in an association, and any other consensual lien or title retention contract intended as security for an obligation.

“Special declarant rights” mean rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to:

complete improvements indicated on plats and plans filed with the declaration as provided in section 2-109 of this title or to complete improvements described in the public offering statement pursuant to subdivision 4-103(a)(2) of this title;

exercise any declarant right pursuant to section 2-110 of this title;

maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the common interest community, and models (section 2-115);

use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the common interest community or within real estate which may be added to the common interest community (section 2-116);

make the common interest community subject to a master association (section 2-120);

merge or consolidate a common interest community with another common interest community of the same form of ownership (section 2-121);

appoint or remove any officer of the association or any master association or any executive board member during any period of declarant control (section 3-103);

control any construction, design review, or aesthetic standards committee or process;

attend meetings of the unit owners and, except during an executive session, the executive board; and

have access to the records of the association to the same extent as a unit owner.

“Time share” means a time share estate as defined by

32 V.S.A. § 3619(a)

.

“Unit” means a physical portion of the common interest community designated for separate ownership or occupancy.

“Unit owner” means a declarant or other person that owns a unit.

“Assessment” means the sum attributable to each unit and due to the association pursuant to the budget adopted under section 3-123 of this title.

“Association” means the unit owners association.

“Bylaws” means the instruments, however denominated, that contain the procedures for conduct of the affairs of the association, regardless of the form in which the association is organized, including any amendments to the instruments.

“Record,” used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Residential purposes” means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.

“Rule” means a policy, guideline, restriction, procedure, or regulation of an association, however denominated, which is not set forth in the declaration or bylaws and which governs the conduct of persons or the use or appearance of property.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-104.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this title, the effect of the provisions of this title may not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by this title may not be waived. Except as otherwise provided in section 1-207 of this title, a declarant may not act under a power of attorney or use any other device to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this title or the declaration.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-105.
Separate titles and taxation.

In a condominium or planned community:

if there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit that has been created, together with its interest in the common elements, constitutes for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate;

if there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit shall be separately taxed and assessed, and no separate tax or assessment may be rendered against any common elements for which a declarant has reserved no development rights; provided, however, that if a portion of the common elements is located in a town other than the town in which the unit is located, the town in which the common elements are located may designate that portion of the common elements within its boundaries as a parcel for property tax assessment purposes and may tax each unit owner at an appraisal value pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 3481

.

Any portion of the common elements for which the declarant has reserved any development right shall be separately taxed and assessed against the declarant, and the declarant alone is liable for payment of those taxes.

If there is no unit owner other than a declarant, the real estate comprising a common interest community may be taxed and assessed in any manner provided by law.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2011, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. May 15, 2012.

§ 1-106.
Local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A building code may not impose any requirement upon any structure in a common interest community which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership.

No zoning, building codes, subdivision ordinance, or other real property use law, ordinance, or regulation may prohibit the conversion of any building to the common interest community form of ownership.

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, no provision of this title invalidates or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The purpose of this section is to resolve the relative roles of the state and local communities in regulating the creation of common interest communities. The underlying concept is to make clear that the municipality has a legitimate interest in regulating the use of real estate, in accordance with long established zoning, building code, and similar practices, and that such practices continue to have equal applicability to common interest communities as they do to purely rental projects. With respect to forms of ownership, however, this Act, as a state enactment, preempts the field and accordingly, except as provided in the Act, the municipality may not regulate the form of ownership, as opposed to the use of that real estate.

Consistent with the concept described in Comment 1, subsection (a) prohibits discriminatory application of building codes against common interest communities by local law making authorities. Thus, if a building code imposes a requirement which cannot be met if property is owned as a common interest community but which would not be violated if all of the property constituting the common interest community were owned by a single owner, this section makes it unlawful to apply that requirement or restriction to the common interest community. For example, in the case of a high-rise apartment building, if a building code requirement imposing a minimum fire wall rating between apartments would not prevent a rental apartment building from being built, this Act would override any requirement that might impose a higher fire wall rating between apartments merely because the same building might be owned as a common interest community.

While subsection (a) prevents discrimination against all forms of common interest communities under building codes, subsection (b) does not prevent local law making authorities from using zoning, subdivision, and other real estate regulations to specifically regulate the planned community form of ownership, in ways different from rental project, or condominiums. This distinction simply recognizes the existing practice in some communities that permits a local zoning board, as a condition of granting a cluster housing zoning permit, to require the right of prior plan approval. However, such regulations may not be used to proscribe the condominium or cooperative form of ownership, or to discriminate against these two types of common interest communities. Accordingly, a community could not prevent a condominium conversion by applying setback requirements between apartments which would not apply if all the apartments were owned by a single owner, or by requiring more parking for condominiums than for rental apartments.

Subsection (c) makes clear that, except for the prohibition on discrimination against common interest communities under building codes, and except for the prohibition on the use of zoning, subdivision, and other real estate laws, ordinances, or regulations to ban or discriminate against cooperatives and condominiums, the Act has no effect on real estate or personal property laws. For example, a particular parcel of real estate submitted to the common interest community form of ownership might be of such size that all of the real estate is required to support a proposed density of units or to satisfy minimum setback requirements. Under this Act, part of the submitted real estate might be subject to a development right entitling the declarant to withdraw it from the common interest community, but the mere reservation of this right would not constitute a subdivision of the parcel into separate ownership. If a declarant or foreclosing lender at a later time sought to exercise the option to withdraw the real estate, however, withdrawal would constitute a subdivision and would be illegal if the effect of withdrawal would be to violate setback requirements, or to exceed the density of units permitted on the remaining parcel.

§ 1-107.
Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain or if a part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a remnant that may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted by the declaration, the award shall include compensation to the unit owner for that unit and its allocated interests, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree provides otherwise, the allocated interests of that unit are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection is thereafter a common element.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award shall compensate the unit owner for the reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Unless the decree provides otherwise, upon acquisition:

the allocated interests of that unit shall be reduced in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit or on any other basis specified in the declaration; and

the portion of the allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit shall be automatically reallocated to that unit and to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, with the partially acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, the portion of the award attributable to the common elements taken shall be paid to the association. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any portion of the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element shall be equally divided among the owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition.

The court decree shall be recorded in every municipality in which any portion of the common interest community is located.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The provisions of this statute are not intended to supplant the usual rules of eminent domain but merely to supplement those rules in addressing the unique problems which eminent domain raises in the context of a common interest community. Nevertheless, because the law of eminent domain differs widely among the various States, the law of each State should be reviewed to ensure that the eminent domain code and this section are properly integrated. For example, subsection (a) uses the words “the award must include compensation to the unit owner.” This language, a change first made in MRECA, suggests that, under other state law, compensation for other interests may be required in an appropriate case and the section does not limit that result.

When a unit is taken or partially taken by eminent domain, this section provides for a recalculation of the allocated interests of all units.

An important issue raised by this section is whether or not a governmental body acquiring a unit by eminent domain has a right to also take that unit’s allocated interests and thereby assume membership in the association by virtue of its power of eminent domain. While there is no question that a governmental body may acquire any real property by eminent domain, there is no case law on the question of whether or not the governmental body may take a unit as part of a common interest community or must take the unit and have the unit excluded from the common interest community.

In the circumstances of a taking of part of a unit, it is important to have some objective test by which to measure the portion of allocated interests to be reallocated. Subsection (b) sets forth a formula based on relative size, but permits the declaration to vary that formula to some other more appropriate formula in a particular circumstance. The right to vary the formula in the declaration is important, since it is clear that the formula set forth in the statute may in some instances result in gross inequities.

Even before the amendment formally acknowledging the reallocation of percentages required by this section is recorded, the reallocation is deemed to have occurred simultaneously with the taking. This rule is necessary to avoid the hiatus that otherwise could occur between the taking and the reallocation of interests, votes, and liabilities.

Example 1:
Suppose that all allocated interests in a nine-unit common interest community were originally allocated to the units on the basis of size.
If eight of the units are all equal in size and one is twice as large as the others, the allocated interests would be 20% for the largest unit and 10% for each of the other eight units.

Suppose that one of the smaller units is removed from the common interest community by a condemning authority. Subsection (a) provides that the allocated interests would automatically shift, at the time of the taking, so that the larger unit would have 22 2/9% while each of the small units would have 11 1/9%.

Example 2:
Suppose, in Example 1, that the condemnation only reduced the size of one of the smaller units by 50%, leaving the remaining half of the unit usable.
Subsection (b) provides that the allocated interests would automatically shift to 55/19% for the partially taken unit, 2110/19% for the largest unit, and 1010/19% for each of the other units.
Note that the fact that the partially taken unit was reduced to half its former size does not mean that its allocated interests are only half as large as before the taking. Rather, that unit participates in the reallocation in proportion to its reduced size.
That is why the partially taken units’ reallocated interests are 55/19% rather than 5%.

Subsection (a) merely requires that the taking body compensate the unit owner for all of his unit and its allocated interests, whether or not any common elements are acquired. The Act also requires that the allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon taking to the remaining units unless the decree provides otherwise.
Whether or not the decree may constitutionally provide otherwise in the case of a particular taking (for example, by allocating the allocated interests to the government) is an unanswered question.

Example 1:
Suppose in a commercial common interest community consisting of four units, each unit consists of a factory and parking lot, and the declaration provides that each unit’s common expense liability, including utilities, is equal.
Suppose further that the area of the factory building and parking lot in unit number one are equal, and that 1/2 the parking lot is taken by eminent domain, leaving the factory and 1/2 the lot intact.
Under the formula set out in the statute, unit number one’s common expense liability would be reduced even though its utilities might not be reduced at all, thus resulting in a windfall for the unit owner.

Example 2:
Suppose that a common interest community contains ten units, each of which is allocated a 1/10 undivided interest in the association.
Suppose further that a taking by eminent domain reduces the size of one of the units by 50%.
In such case, the ownership interest of all the units will be reallocated so that the partially-taken unit has a 1/19 undivided interest in the common elements and the remaining nine units each has a 2/19 undivided interest in the common elements.
Thus, the partially-taken unit has a common element interest equal to 1/2 of the common element interest allocated to each of the other units.
Note that this is not equivalent to the partially-taken unit having a 5% undivided interest and the remaining nine units each having a 10% undivided interest.

§ 1-108.
General principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations, any other form of organization authorized by the law of this state, unincorporated associations, the law of real estate, the law of contracts, principal and agent, and eminent domain, supplement the provisions of this title, except to the extent these principles are inconsistent with the title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-109.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This chapter is a general act intended to create unified coverage of its subject matter, and no part of it shall be construed to be repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can be reasonably avoided.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section derives from Section 1-104 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

§ 1-110.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This title shall be applied and construed to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this title among states which enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This Act should be construed in accordance with its underlying purpose of making the law uniform with respect to all forms of common interest communities, as well as the purposes stated in the Prefatory Note of simplifying, clarifying, and modernizing the law of common interest communities, promoting the interstate flow of funds to common interest communities, and protecting consumers, purchasers, and borrowers against common interest community practices which may cause unreasonable risk of loss to them.
Accordingly, the test of each section should be read in light of the purpose and policy of the rule or principle in question, and also of the Act as a whole.

§ 1-111.
Severability.

If any provision of this title or the application of it to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or applications, the provisions of this title are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 1-112.
Unconscionable agreement or term of contract.

The court, upon finding as a matter of law that a contract or contract clause was unconscionable at the time the contract was made, may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause or limit the application of any unconscionable clause in order to avoid an unconscionable result.

Whenever it is claimed or appears to the court that a contract or any clause of the contract is or may be unconscionable, the parties, in order to aid the court in making the determination shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence regarding:

the commercial setting of the negotiations;

whether a party has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of the other party to reasonably protect his or her interests because of physical or mental infirmity, illiteracy, inability to understand the language of the agreement or similar factors;

the effect and purpose of the contract or clause; and

in the case of a sale, any gross disparity at the time of contracting between the amount charged for the property and the value of the property measured by the price at which similar property was readily obtainable in similar transactions. Such a disparity does not of itself render the contract unconscionable.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is similar to Section 2-302 of the Uniform Commercial Code and Section 1-311 of the Uniform Land Transactions Act.
The rationale and Comments provided in those sections are equally applicable to this section.

§ 1-113.
Good faith.

Every contract or duty governed by this title imposes an obligation of good faith on all parties in its performance or enforcement.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section sets forth a basic principle running throughout this Act: in transactions involving common interest communities, good faith is required in the performance and enforcement of all agreements and duties.
Good faith, as sued in this Act, means observance of two standards: “honesty in fact,” and observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.
While the term is not defined, the term is derived from and used in the same manner as in Section 1-201 of the Uniform Simplification of Land Transfers Act, and Sections 2-103(i)(b) and 7-404 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

§ 1-114.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by this title shall be liberally administered so that the aggrieved party is placed in the position the aggrieved party would have been if the other party had fully performed. However, consequential, special, or punitive damages shall not be awarded except as specifically provided in this title or pursuant to other laws.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-115.
Adjustment of dollar amounts.

From time to time the dollar amounts specified in section 1-203 of this title shall change as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section according to and to the extent of changes in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers: U.S. City Average, All Items 1967 = 100, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor (the “Index”). The Index for December 1990, which was 401, is the Reference Base Index.

The dollar amount specified in section 1-203 of this title and any amount stated in the declaration pursuant to that section shall change annually on July 1 if the percentage of change, calculated to the nearest whole percentage point, between the Index at the end of the preceding year and the Reference Base Index is 10 percent or more, but:

the portion of the percentage change in the Index in excess of a multiple of 10 percent shall be disregarded and the dollar amounts shall change only in multiples of 10 percent of the amounts appearing in this title on January 1, 1999;

the dollar amounts shall not change if the amounts required by this section are those currently in effect pursuant to this title as a result of earlier application of this section; and

in no event shall the dollar amounts be reduced below the amounts appearing in this title on the date of enactment.

If the Index is revised after December 1979, the percentage of change pursuant to this section shall be calculated on the basis of the revised Index. If the revision of the Index changes the Reference Base Index, a revised Reference Base Index shall be determined by multiplying the Reference Base Index then applicable by the rebasing factor furnished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the Index is superseded, the Index referred to in this section is the one represented by the Bureau of Labor Statistics as reflecting most accurately changes in the purchasing power of the dollar for consumers.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The 1994 revision deleted the reference to Section 4-101(b)(7) to reflect the fact that another amendment deletes that section from the Act.

Subsection (c) requires recalculation of the Consumer Price Index if the Reference Base Index should be changed by the Department of Labor.

In 1987, the Bureau of Labor Statistics did in fact change the CPI for Urban and Clerical Workers, which used a 1967 base year, by adopting a rebasing factor.
The new Index uses a base year of “1982-84 = 100.”

While the index referenced in this Uniform Act is now obsolete, the drafters declined to modify the Uniform Act to delete reference to the old index.
As of mid-1993, all the States which had adopted a version of UCIOA incorporated this indexing section.
There is no reason to suggest that those adoptions were in error or that they even require amendment, since the statute as drafted has a functioning and mandatory self-correction mechanism.

However, States which choose to adopt this Act after 1994 should revise subsection (a)—as Nevada did, for example—to refer to “1982-84 = 100,” rather than “1967 = 100.”

Subsection (c) of the Act requires an adopting State to revise the Reference Base Index when, as is now the case, the “revision of the index changes the Reference Base Index.” The rebasing factor for the 1967 Index furnished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics is 0.3357175.
Applying that rebasing factor to the original December, 1979 Reference Base Index of 230 yields a Revised Reference Base Index of 77.215, or 77.

The December 1994 Index (using the 1982-84 = 100 Base) was 147.2.
Accordingly, a recalculation of the $300 figure in Section 1-203 as of July 1, 1995 would be done as follows:

December 1979 Index
=
77
(1967 Reference Base Index of
230, multiplied by the rebasing
factor and rounded to the nearest
whole percent).

December 1994 Index
=
147.0
(Using 1982-84 = 100 Index for
the end of 1994, the year
preceding 1995, rounded to the
nearest whole percent).

70 is 90.9% of the Reference Base Index, or more than a 10% increase. Thus, on July 1, 1995, the $300 amount specified in Section 1-203 would increase. Because the amount of increase “in excess of a multiple of 10% must be disregarded,” the dollar amount of $300 increases by 90%, or $270. Therefore, as of July 1, 1995 the triggering dollar amount would be $570, or $47.50 per month.

§ 1-116.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This title modifies, limits, and supercedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supercede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.